Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1709
School or establishment; massage therapist; license required.

No person shall engage in the practice of massage therapy or the operation of a massage therapy school or establishment unless he or she obtains a license from the department for that purpose.

Laws 1955, c. 273, § 11, p. 866;

Laws 1957, c. 297, § 7, p. 1073;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-2712;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 137;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,280;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 616.